Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5659
Commission; powers and duties.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) Advise the department regarding the development and implementation of a state rural health policy;

(2) Advise the department and other appropriate parties in all matters relating to rural health care;

(3) Serve as an advocate for rural Nebraska in health care issues;

(4) Maintain liaison with all agencies, groups, and organizations concerned with rural health care in order to facilitate integration of efforts and commonality of goals;

(5) Identify problems in the delivery of health care in rural Nebraska, in the education and training of health care providers in rural Nebraska, in the regulation of health care providers and institutions in rural Nebraska, and in any other matters relating to rural health care;

(6) Prepare recommendations to the appropriate bodies to alleviate the problems identified;

(7) Advise the department regarding the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act;

(8) Designate health profession shortage areas in Nebraska; and

(9) Select recipients of financial incentives available under the act.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 57.